Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.410

Auditing services revolving account—Created—Purpose.

An auditing services revolving account is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of a centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the actual costs of the audits provided to state agencies by the state auditor and audits of the state employee whistleblower program under RCW 42.40.110.

[ 1999 c 361 s 9; 1995 c 301 s 25; 1981 c 336 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 336: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1981." [ 1981 c 336 s 8.]